Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.191

Rules and regulations.

The secretary shall have the power and duty to formulate and prescribe such rules and regulations as may be reasonable in the proper administration of this chapter. In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(1) Set all fees required in this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(2) Establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(3) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and licensees.

[ 1990 c 147 s 15; 1955 c 149 s 13.]